Hawaii statutes.
§414D-90 Derivative suits. (a) A
proceeding may be brought on behalf of a domestic or foreign corporation to
procure a judgment in its favor by any member or members having five per cent
or more of the voting power, or by fifty members, whichever is less, or any
director.

(b) In any such proceeding, each complainant
shall be a member or director at the time the proceeding is initiated.

(c) A complaint in a proceeding brought on
behalf of a corporation shall be verified and allege with particularity the
demand made, if any, to obtain action by the directors, and either why the
complainants could not obtain the action or why they did not make the demand.
If a demand for action was made and the corporation's investigation of the
demand is in progress when the proceeding is filed, the court may stay the suit
until the investigation is completed.

(d) On termination of the proceeding, the
court may require the complainants to pay any defendant's reasonable expenses
(including counsel fees) incurred in defending the suit if it finds that the
proceeding was commenced frivolously or in bad faith.

(e) If the proceeding on behalf of the
corporation results in the corporation taking some action requested by the
complainants or otherwise is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything
was received by the complainants as the result of a judgment, compromise, or
settlement of an action or claim, the court may award the complainants
reasonable expenses (including counsel fees).

(f) The complainants shall notify the attorney
general within ten days after commencing any proceeding under this section if
the proceeding involves a public benefit corporation. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1;
am L 2004, c 171, §6]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next